Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 Employees Engaged in Operation of Trains Generally

46-8-150 through 46-8-152.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 182, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 185, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 186, §§ 1-3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2237-2242; Ga. L. 1908, p. 49, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2690-2696; Penal Code 1910, § 525; Code 1933, §§ 18-106, 18-605, 94-901, 94-902, 94-9907, 94-1106; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 4/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 4/SB 285 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 2006.